Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1105
Members; oath of office.

Each commissioner and every officer under the State Highway Commission, before entering upon the duties of his office, shall subscribe and take the constitutional oath of office, which shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

Laws 1953, c. 334, § 5, p. 1097.